Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.0332

State combined fund drive—Secretary of state—Contracts and partnerships.

The secretary of state may enter into contracts and partnerships with private institutions, persons, firms, or corporations for the benefit of the beneficiaries of the Washington state combined fund drive. Activities of the Washington state combined fund drive shall not result in direct commercial solicitation of state employees, or a benefit or advantage that would violate one or more provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW. This section does not authorize individual state agencies to enter into contracts or partnerships unless otherwise authorized by law.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 11; 2010 c 101 s 3; 2003 c 205 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2010 c 101 s 3 and by 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 11, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.